Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the State Marine  Board, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 8,420,531
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 12,038,695
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 9,353,313
(4) Aquatic invasive species ........... $ 1,735,797
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the State Marine Board, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Administration and education... $ 314,691
(2) Marine law enforcement ........... $ 4,333,959
(3) Facilities construction and
maintenance.............................. $ 2,325,698
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $750,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the State Marine Board from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State
Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and transferred to the State Marine Board for grants authorized under  section 74, chapter
669, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5521 (SB 5521-A) Page 2